smi/src/morphology/stems/arabic_roman_digits.lexc
LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ some isolated numeral expressions
           ½:½   NUMTAG ;
           ¹:¹   NUMTAG ;
           ²:²   NUMTAG ;
           ³:³   NUMTAG ;
           ¼:¼   NUMTAG ;
           ¾:¾   NUMTAG ;
